Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
Bond Pool Fund

350.700.
Bond pool fund established. [Repealed.]

350.705.
Bond Pool Commission. [Repealed.]

350.710.
Powers of commission. [Repealed.]

350.715.
Pool administrator. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 137, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 397, § 5, effective July 15, 1988; repealed by 2017 ch. 117, § 49, effective June 29, 2017.

350.720.
Bond pool — Criteria — Compliance records. [Repealed.]

350.725.
Membership fee — Tonnage fee. [Repealed.]

350.730.
Tonnage fee suspension or reinstatement. [Repealed.]

350.735.
Permit-specific penal bond. [Repealed.]

350.740.
Permit issuance. [Repealed.]

350.745.
Payments from fund for reclamation. [Repealed.]

350.750.
Revocation of membership in bond pool. [Repealed.]

350.755.
Grounds for refusal of permit. [Repealed.]